Mississippi, session 2026, SB2959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Mercy House Adult and Teen Challenge for the purpose of defraying expenses related to the development of improvements and additions to the Mercy House Adult and Teen Challenge campus in Georgetown, Mississippi, the planned location of the Mercy House Adult and Teen Challenge short-term drug and alcohol rehabilitation center in Learned, Mississippi, and for the acquisitions of and improvements to Mercy House Adult and Teen Challenge Third Phase and Aftercare Transitional Phase residential houses and facilities throughout Mississippi for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................................ $ 3,631,000.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.